Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2401.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 49, chapter 3, article 5, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 49-559, to read: START_STATUTE49-559. Fuel formulations; biennial review; report; definitions A. Every two years the department shall review the fuel formulations that are available or may be available for use in this state pursuant to federal air quality standards. B. The biennial fuel formulation review shall assess the impacts of switching to various fuel formulations that are not authorized for use in area a or area c at the time of assessment. The department shall note the anticipated air quality impact of each assessed fuel formulation in area a and area c. C. On or before December 31 of each review year, the department shall submit a copy of the report and the department's recommendations to the associate director of the weights and measures services division of the Arizona department of agriculture, the governor, the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives and provide a copy of this report to the secretary of state. D. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Area A" has the same meaning prescribed in section 49-541. 2. "Area C" has the same meaning prescribed in section 3-3401.END_STATUTE